Massachusetts, session 194th, S1334.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 343 to 344, the words “reported for the highest 
quarter” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- wages reported for the highest 
quarter; and provided further, that if such deeming renders the individual ineligible for 
unemployment benefits, the amount shall be 1/26 of the total wages reported in the 2 quarters.